New York, session 2025-2026, S6438.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Electron- 2 ics Repair Scores Act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 399-nn of the general business law is 4 amended by adding two new paragraphs (s) and (t) to read as follows: 5 (s) "Repair score" or "score" means a numerical, alphanumerical, or 6 alphabetical score calculated by the manufacturer based on the repair 7 scoring criteria developed by the department of state. 8 (t) "Detailed score" means the information regarding the calculation 9 and meaning of the repair score as defined by the scoring criteria 10 developed by the department of state. 11 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 399-nn of the general business law, as 12 amended by chapter 48 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 2. Requirements. (a) An original equipment manufacturer shall make 15 available to any independent repair provider and owner of digital elec- 16 tronic equipment manufactured by or on behalf of or sold by such 17 original equipment manufacturer, on fair and reasonable terms, any EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01447-07-6 S. 6438--C 2 1 documentation, parts, and tools required for the diagnosis, maintenance, 2 or repair of such digital electronic equipment and parts that are manu- 3 factured for the first time, and first sold or used in New York on or 4 after July first, two thousand twenty-three. Such documentation, parts, 5 and tools shall be made available either directly by an original equip- 6 ment manufacturer or via an authorized repair provider. An original 7 equipment manufacturer who, in the regular course of business, offers to 8 an owner the services of diagnosis, maintenance or repair of its own 9 digital electronic equipment, and who does not have an arrangement 10 described in paragraph (a) of subdivision one of this section with an 11 unaffiliated individual or business, shall be considered an authorized 12 repair provider with respect to such equipment. 13 (b) (i) For digital electronic equipment that is sold or used in this 14 state, an original equipment manufacturer shall make available to any 15 retail sellers and the department of state the repair score and detailed 16 score for such digital electronic equipment, inclusive of any updates to 17 information. 18 (ii) Original equipment manufacturers shall print the repair score and 19 detailed score on packaging of such digital electronic equipment, the 20 score shall include the logo representation of the score as developed by 21 the department of state. 22 (iii) Original equipment manufacturers shall clearly display repair 23 scores for such products on their website product listing pages, as well 24 as make publicly available detailed scores to all potential purchasers 25 on each product listing page. 26 (iv) Scoring criteria will be determined by the department of state, 27 which shall periodically update such criteria, and a logo representation 28 of scores. Scoring criteria shall apply only to digital electronic 29 equipment manufactured for the first time, and first sold or used in New 30 York on or after one year from the effective date of this paragraph, and 31 which are already subject to widely accepted repairability index stand- 32 ards in other jurisdictions, including international standards. Scoring 33 criteria may include, but is not limited to: the free and public avail- 34 ability of technical documents regarding repair and maintenance of the 35 product; ease of disassembly of the product; availability of tools for 36 repair and maintenance of the product; availability of spare parts for 37 the product; length of software support by the manufacturer of the 38 product; the repair options available for the equipment; and other 39 criteria considered by widely accepted repairability index standards in 40 other jurisdictions. The department of state shall make every effort to 41 incorporate the standards from existing repairability index standards 42 implemented in the U.S. and internationally, to avoid duplicative or 43 inconsistent regulatory standards, unless there are compelling reasons 44 to adopt new or differing standards. 45 § 4. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 46 law.